Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.080

Duties of board and state board—Disbursements.

The board of trustees of each municipal corporation shall provide for enrollment of all members of its fire department under the relief provisions of this chapter; provide for enrollment of all its reserve officers under the relief provisions of this chapter if it has extended these relief provisions to its reserve officers; receive all applications for the enrollment under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter when the municipality has extended these retirement pension provisions to its firefighters or reserve officers; provide for disbursements of relief; determine the eligibility of firefighters and reserve officers for retirement pensions; and pass on all claims and direct payment thereof from the principal fund to those entitled thereto. Vouchers shall be issued to the persons entitled thereto by the local board. It shall send to the state board, after each meeting, a voucher for each person entitled to payment from the principal fund, stating the amount of such payment and for what granted, which voucher shall be certified and signed by the chair and secretary of the local board. The state board, after review and approval, shall cause a warrant to be issued on the principal fund for the amount specified and approved on each voucher. However, in retirement pension cases after the applicant's eligibility for pension is verified, the state board shall authorize the regular issuance of monthly warrants or electronic transfers of funds in payment of the retirement pension without further action of the board of trustees of any such municipality.

[ 1999 c 148 s 8; 1989 c 91 s 12; 1969 c 118 s 2; 1955 c 263 s 9; 1945 c 261 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-22. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 2; RRS s 9578-2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.